Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-340
Motorcycle, defined.

Motorcycle means any motor vehicle having a seat or saddle for use of the operator and designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground. Motorcycle includes an autocycle.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 40;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 9;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 48.